District of Columbia statutes.
20-734

Duty to account; unsupervised administration.

An unsupervised personal representative shall account to interested persons for his receipts, disbursements, and distribution of estate assets at reasonable intervals, or on reasonable demand, and may be compelled to account to the Court in a proceeding initiated by an interested person, following notice and hearing.

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(ww), 42 DCR 63
This section is referenced in § 20-733.
1981 Ed., § 20-734.
Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-701.01.